Virginia statutes. Title 30. General Assembly.
Chapter 11. Joint Commission on Technology and Science.

§ 30-85.
Commission established; powers and duties.

The Joint Commission on Technology and Science (JCOTS) is hereby established as a permanent legislative agency of the Commonwealth. JCOTS shall generally study all aspects of technology and science and endeavor to stimulate, encourage, promote, and assist in the development of technology and science in the Commonwealth and sound public policies related thereto. In addition, JCOTS shall:

Evaluate the impact of existing statutes and proposed legislation related to technology and science in the Commonwealth;

Advise the General Assembly, Governor, and agencies, authorities, and institutions of the Commonwealth upon matters related to technology and science;

Investigate, research, and consider such issues related to technology and science as may be requested by the General Assembly or determined by JCOTS;

Make recommendations to the General Assembly and the Governor;

Consult with appropriate entities, public or private, on matters related to technology and science under JCOTS’ consideration;

Encourage research and development in technology and science;

Solicit input from appropriate entities, public or private, on issues related to technology and science;

Coordinate its efforts with and assist the efforts of other agencies, authorities, and institutions of the Commonwealth;

Accept private or public funds to carry out its purposes; and

Annually report its findings and recommendations to the General Assembly and the Governor. JCOTS shall make such further interim reports to the General Assembly and the Governor as it deems advisable or as required by concurrent resolution of the General Assembly or by the Governor. The chairman of JCOTS shall submit to the General Assembly and the Governor an annual executive summary of the interim activity and work of JCOTS no later than the first day of each regular session of the General Assembly. The executive summary shall be submitted as provided in the procedures of the Division of Legislative Automated Systems for the processing of legislative documents and reports and shall be posted on the General Assembly’s website.

History.

1997, c. 847; 2005, c. 322.

Cross references.

As to annual report by the Chief Information Officer to the Governor and Joint Commission on Technology and Science on the use and application of information technology by state agencies and public institutions of higher education, see §

2.2-2007

.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 322, throughout the section, substituted “JCOTS” for “the Commission”; added the second through last sentences in subdivision 10; and made a minor stylistic change.

Law Review.

For an article, “Technology and the Law,” see 32 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1383 (1998).

For 2000 survey of Virginia technology law, see 34 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1051. (2000).

§ 30-86.
Membership; terms; vacancies; chairman and vice-chairman; expenses; quorum.

JCOTS shall be composed of 12 members, seven of whom shall be appointed by the Speaker of the House of Delegates from the membership thereof, in accordance with the principles of proportional representation contained in the Rules of the House of Delegates, and five of whom shall be appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules from the membership of the Senate.

Members shall serve for terms coincident with their terms of office. Members may be reappointed for successive terms. Vacancies occurring other than by expiration of term shall be filled for the unexpired term. Vacancies shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointments.

JCOTS members shall receive compensation as provided in § 30-19.12 and shall be reimbursed from funds appropriated or otherwise available to JCOTS for reasonable and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties as provided in §§

2.2-2813

and

2.2-2825

.

Five members of JCOTS shall constitute a quorum. At the first meeting following the adjournment sine die of the Regular Session in an even-numbered year, JCOTS shall elect a chairman and vice-chairman from among its membership. A vacancy in either office shall be filled for the unexpired term in the same manner. Meetings of JCOTS shall be held at the call of the chairman or whenever members constituting a quorum so request.

History.

1997, c. 847; 2000, c. 1046; 2005, c. 322.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 1046, effective April 19, 2000, in the first sentence of subsection A, substituted “twelve” for “nine” substituted “seven“ for “five” and substituted “five” for “four”; and inserted “in accordance with the principles of proportional representation contained in the Rules of the House of Delegates,”; added the second sentence in subsection A; substituted “Members shall serve for terms coincident with their terms of office” for “All appointments shall be for terms of four years” as the first sentence in subsection B; and rewrote the fifth sentence in subsection B.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 322 rewrote the section.

§ 30-87.
Staff; cooperation and assistance.

The Division of Legislative Services shall provide staff support to JCOTS. All agencies, authorities, and institutions of the Commonwealth shall cooperate and provide assistance to JCOTS upon request.

History.

1997, c. 847; 2005, c. 322.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 322, in the first sentence, deleted “Staff assistance shall be provided to the Commission by” at the beginning and added “shall provide staff support to JCOTS” at the end; and substituted “assistance to JCOTS upon request” for “such assistance to the Commission as the Commission may request” in the last sentence.

§ 30-88.
Advisory committees.

JCOTS may establish advisory committees composed of persons with expertise in the matters under consideration by JCOTS. Such persons shall serve without compensation, but shall be reimbursed from funds appropriated or otherwise available to JCOTS for reasonable and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties as provided in §§

2.2-2813

and

2.2-2825

, unless they waive reimbursement.

History.

1997, c. 847; 2005, c. 322.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 322, throughout the section, substituted “JCOTS” for “the Commission,” in the last sentence, deleted “entitled to be” preceding “reimbursed from funds” and added the language beginning “as provided” at the end.

§ 30-89.
Reserved.